New York, session 2025-2026, S2474.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "H2 energy scale up act". 3 § 2. Section 1854 of the public authorities law is amended by adding a 4 new subdivision 27 to read as follows: 5 27. (a) To administer a program, using funds provided for such 6 purpose, to provide grants, loans or other services, based on standards 7 and guidelines established by the authority, or any other entity author- 8 ized by law to award such funding, for the costs related to the demon- 9 stration or scale up of the production, processing, delivery, storage, 10 or end use of clean hydrogen. The primary purpose of such funding shall 11 be to aid the conversion or retrofitting of fossil fuel facilities, 12 functioning and nonfunctioning, to improve the completion and expedition 13 of green and pink hydrogen projects. Such standards and guidelines shall 14 include, but not be limited to, an evaluation of (i) the clean energy 15 supply and the balance of green hydrogen projects and pink hydrogen 16 projects, (ii) whether the hydrogen project will yield hourly matching, 17 and (iii) whether the deliverability of a project supports substantial 18 deployment of clean energy in this decade while being efficiently and 19 responsibly interconnected to the current generation systems. Projects 20 shall be approved by the authority prior to completion in order to 21 receive the funds authorized by this subdivision. A participating entity EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06643-02-5 S. 2474--A 2 1 shall only continue to receive funding if it meets the completion and 2 effectiveness and efficiency requirements established by the authority. 3 (b) (i) No later than December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-six, 4 and annually thereafter, each participating entity shall report to the 5 authority on the completion of its clean hydrogen project and the effi- 6 ciency of its scale up. 7 (ii) No later than April first, two thousand twenty-seven, and annual- 8 ly thereafter, the authority shall report to the governor, the temporary 9 president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the chair of the 10 senate energy and telecommunications committee and the chair of the 11 assembly energy committee on the results of such program including the 12 information provided to the authority in subparagraph (i) of this para- 13 graph, any funds disbursed, projects completed and the effectiveness and 14 efficiency of such projects. Information on the effectiveness of fund- 15 ing and expediting each hydrogen project shall be based on year over 16 year data starting after the first full cycle of renewable energy 17 production from the funded hydrogen project. 18 (iii) The authority shall make the report required pursuant to subpar- 19 agraph (ii) of this paragraph available to the public on its website. 20 (c) For the purposes of this subdivision: 21 (i) "green hydrogen project" means renewable hydrogen, obtained by 22 electrolysis of water. Such projects shall be powered entirely by renew- 23 able energy and generate no greenhouse gas emissions into the atmos- 24 phere; and 25 (ii) "pink hydrogen project" means hydrogen produced mainly from 26 nuclear power and electrolysis, that generates greenhouse gas emissions. 27 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.